Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1092.
do enact as follows:SB1092,13Section 1. 196.03 (5r) of the statutes is created to read:SB1092,1,64196.03 (5r) The commission may not authorize rates for retail electric service 5that exceed an increase of 5 percent over rates in place for that utility in the prior 6year.SB1092,27Section 2. 196.03 (5r) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 8(this act), is repealed.SB1092,31Section 3. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 2publication, except as follows:SB1092,2,33(1) The repeal of s. 196.03 (5r) takes effect on January 1, 2029.SB1092,2,44